New York, session 2025-2026, A10240.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 502 of the racing, pari-mutuel 2 wagering and breeding law, as amended by chapter 710 of the laws of 3 1990, is amended to read as follows: 4 1. a. A regional off-track betting corporation is hereby established 5 for each region, except the New York city region for which the New York 6 city off-track betting corporation established pursuant to and subject 7 to article six of this chapter shall constitute the regional corporation 8 and such article six shall govern such New York city off-track betting 9 corporation. Each regional corporation shall be a body corporate and 10 politic constituting a public benefit corporation. Each corporation 11 shall be administered by a board of directors consisting of two members 12 from each participating county containing a city of over one hundred 13 fifty thousand in population, according to the last federal census, and 14 one member from each other participating county. Notwithstanding any 15 other provision of law to the contrary, the members shall be appointed 16 by the county governing body, and may, at the discretion of such govern- 17 ing body of counties which have a population of less than two hundred 18 thousand, include sitting members of such governing body. A member of a 19 governing body who is appointed a director after July first, nineteen 20 hundred ninety shall not be compensated by the regional corporation; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14846-09-6 A. 10240--B 2 1 provided, however, that the mayor of a city of over one hundred fifty 2 thousand that has elected to participate in the management of a corpo- 3 ration pursuant to subdivision two of this section shall, with the 4 approval of the city's legislative body, appoint one of the members to 5 which the county containing such city is entitled. In the case of the 6 corporation established for the Suffolk region and Nassau region, the 7 board of directors of each corporation shall consist of three members 8 appointed by the governing body of each county, not more than two of 9 whom shall be members of the same political party. Each director shall 10 serve at the pleasure of the governing body or mayor appointing [him] 11 such director, as the case may be. A [chairman] chair shall be elected 12 by the members to serve a term of one year. 13 b. No person who has served as a board member or officer of the corpo- 14 ration shall within a period of ten years after such person's termi- 15 nation of such service, regardless of the reason for termination, (i) be 16 appointed or qualified as a member of the corporation; or (ii) appear, 17 practice before, or communicate with the corporation, directly or indi- 18 rectly, to promote or oppose the passage of resolutions by the board of 19 directors. 20 c. No person who is appointed to be a member of the board of directors 21 may attend or participate in any board meetings, including executive 22 sessions, until that person's application for a license has been 23 approved by the commission. 24 § 2. Subdivisions 6 and 7 of section 502-a of the racing, pari-mutuel 25 wagering and breeding law are renumbered subdivisions 7 and 8 and a new 26 subdivision 6 is added to read as follows: 27 6. a. No person who has served as a board member or officer of the 28 corporation shall within a period of ten years after such person's 29 termination of such service, regardless of the reason for termination, 30 (i) be appointed or qualified as a member of the corporation; or (ii) 31 appear, practice before, or communicate with the corporation, directly 32 or indirectly, to promote or oppose the passage of resolutions by the 33 board of directors. 34 b. No person who is appointed to be a member of the board of directors 35 may attend or participate in any board meetings, including executive 36 sessions, until that person's application for a license has been 37 approved by the commission. 38 § 3. Section 2 of part JJ of chapter 56 of the laws of 2023, amending 39 the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law, relating to the 40 membership of the board of directors of the western regional off-track 41 betting corporation, is amended to read as follows: 42 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 43 effective immediately, cities and counties may take any action necessary 44 to begin the selection and appointment process for new board member 45 terms pursuant to this act; and provided further, that upon selection of 46 new board members, cities and counties shall notify the corporation of 47 their respective appointments via certified mail; and provided further, 48 that this act shall expire and be deemed repealed [four] fourteen years 49 after such effective date. 50 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 51 the amendments to section 502-a of the racing, pari-mutuel wagering and 52 breeding law made by section two of this act shall not affect the repeal 53 of such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith.